parSem/xip/archive/simple.4/english/FST/src/lex-business.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Country and region names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 16-Mar-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [0]: old analyser
!# [2]: file orgNames.xfst  
!# [3]: file organisations.xfst
!# [4]: file additins.xfst
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name

+PostMod	! post-modifier (e.g. "inc.")
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	(e.g. "Federal")
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "Association")

+Prod		! product name
+Bus		! business organisation
+Inst		! institution (school, university, ...)
+Org		! organisation (political party, ...)

+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym
 
+Sg		! singular
+Pl		! plural
+Gen		! genitive/possessive 's

! for internal use:
^AND		! & or " and "
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation


! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
! 	+Prop +Bus 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron)
! 	+Prop +Bus +Head 	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
! 	+Prop +Bus +PostMod 			 (+Abbr)
! 	+Prop +Bus +PreMod
!
! 	+Prop +Inst 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen)
! 	+Prop +Inst +Head 	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
!
! 	+Prop +Org 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron) 
! 	+Prop +Org +Head 	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
! 	+Prop +Org +PostMod 			 (+Abbr)
! 	+Prop +Org +PreMod
!
!	+Prop +Prod 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron)
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------




! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# related nouns and adjectives
!
!*	LEXICON NOUN		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG+PLs;
!*	LEXICON NOUNINV		< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		optGENSG;
!*
!*	LEXICON ADJ		< %+Adj:0 >			#;
!*
!*	! noun or adjective
!*	LEXICON NADJ		< %+NAdj:0 %+Sg:0 >		#;
!*				< %+Noun:0 %+Sg:0 >		GENSG;
!*				< %+Noun:0 %+Pl:{+s} >		optGENPL;
!*	LEXICON NADJINV		< %+NAdj:0 %+SP:0 >		#;
!*				< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		GENSG;
!*
!*	! possible replacement:
!*	! LEXICON NADJ		ADJ; NOUN;
!*	! LEXICON NADJINV	ADJ; NOUNINV;

LEXICON ROOT 
Advanced+Bus			PREMOD;
Aero+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3]
Aeronautical+Bus		HEAD;		!	[3]
Aerospace+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
A.G.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# DE
AG+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# DE
AGM+Org+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Annual General Meeting ??
Aid+Org				HEAD/SG;	!	[3]
Air+Bus				PREMOD;		!	[3] ??
Aircraft+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Airport+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Alliance+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Associate+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Associated+Org			PREMOD;
Association+Org			HEAD;
Association+Org+Abbr:Assn^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Authority+Org			HEAD;		!	[3]
Bancgroup+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Bancshare+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Banker+Bus			HEAD;
Bankshare+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Biopharma+Bus			HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
Body+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Brand+Bus			HEAD;
Broadcasting+Bus		HEAD;
Brothers+Bus			POSTMOD;	!	[3] ?
Bureau+Inst			HEAD;		!	[3]
Capital+Bus			PREMOD;		! also Head ?	
Center+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Chamber+Org			HEAD;		!	[3]
Chemical+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3]
Chronicle+Bus			HEAD/SG;
Club+Org			HEAD;
College+Inst			HEAD;		!	[3]
Commercial+Bus			PREMOD;
Commission+Org			HEAD;		!	[3]
Communication+Bus		HEAD;		!	[3]
Compagnie+Bus+Abbr:Cie^DOT	HEAD/SG;	! French
Company+Bus+Abbr:Co^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Company+Bus+Abbr:Cp^DOT		HEAD/SG;	!	[0]
Computer+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Conservatory+Inst		HEAD;		!	[3]
Consolidated+Bus		POSTMOD;	! also PreMod ?
Consortium+Org			HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
Consulting+Bus			HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
Cooperative+Bus			HEAD;
Cooperative+Bus+Abbr:coop^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Corporation+Bus+Abbr:Corp^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Corporation+Bus+Abbr:corp^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Court+Inst			HEAD;
Data+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3] ??
Department+Inst+Abbr:Dept^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Device+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Electronic+Bus			HEAD;		! also PreMod ?
Engineering+Bus			POSTMOD;	!	[3] ??
Entertainment+Bus		HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
Equipment+Bus			HEAD;
Federal+Org			PREMOD;
Federated+Org			PREMOD;		! also PostMod ?
Federation+Bus+Abbr:Fed^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Film+Bus			HEAD;
Financial+Bus			PREMOD;
Front+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
GmbH+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# DE
Government+Org			HEAD;		!	[3]
Harbor+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]	??
Incorporated+Bus		POSTMOD;
Incorporated+Bus+Abbr:Inc^DOT	POSTMOD;
Incorporated+Bus+Abbr:inc^DOT	POSTMOD;
Industry+Bus			HEAD;
Industry+Bus+Abbr:Ind^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Industry+Bus+Abbr:ind^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Insurance+Bus			HEAD;
International+Bus+Abbr:Intl^DOT	POSTMOD;
International+Bus+Abbr:intl^DOT	POSTMOD;
International+Bus		POSTMOD;
League+Org			HEAD;		!	[3]
Limited+Bus			POSTMOD;
Limited+Bus+Abbr:Ltd^DOT	POSTMOD;
Limited+Bus+Abbr:ltd^DOT	POSTMOD;
LLC+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Limited Liabilty Company
Llc+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Limited Liabilty Company
L.l.c.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Limited Liabilty Company
LP+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Limited Partnership
L.P.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Limited Partnership
Market+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
mbH+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# DE
Mining+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3] ??
Mirror+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
National+Bus			POSTMOD;	!	[3] ??
Navy+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Office+Inst			HEAD;		!	[3]
Online+Bus			POSTMOD;	! also PreMod ?
Organization+Org		HEAD;		!	[3]
Pharma+Bus			POSTMOD;	!	[3] ??
Pharmaceutical+Bus		HEAD;		!	[3] ??
PLC+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	! 	=Public Limited Company
Plc+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Public Limited Company
plc+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Public Limited Company
P.l.c.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Public Limited Company
p.l.c.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Public Limited Company
Product+Bus			HEAD;
Press+Bus			HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
PTT+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Postal, Telephone and Telegraph
P.T.T.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	! 	=Postal, Telephone and Telegraph
Records+Bus			HEAD/PL;	!	[3] ??
Regiment+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Research+Inst			HEAD/SG;	!	[3] ??
S.A.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# FR	=Société anonyme
SA+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!# FR	=Société anonyme
Semiconductor+Bus		HEAD;		!	[3] ??
Soft+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3] ??
Solution+Bus			HEAD;
SpA+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Società per azioni
S.p.A.+Bus+Abbr			POSTMOD;	!	[3]	=Società per azioni
Standard+Bus			PREMOD;
System+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3]
Techsystems+Bus			HEAD/PL;	!	[3] ??
Telecom+Bus			HEAD/SG;	!	[3]
Telecommunication+Bus		HEAD;		!	[3]
Therapeutics+Bus		HEAD/PL;	!	[3] ??
Tribune+Bus			HEAD;		!	[3] ??
United+Org			PREMOD;
Universal+Bus			PREMOD;		! also PostMod ?
University+Inst			HEAD;		!	[3]
Venture+Bus			PREMOD;		!	[3] ??
Abarth+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Aftenposten+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Al-Nahda+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Alaska% BP% Pipelines+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Amazon.com+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
American% Airlines+Bus				PROP/PL;	
American% Home% Products+Bus			PROP/PL;	
American% Stores+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Andronico+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Applied% Materials+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Armco+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Arvin% Industries+Bus				PROP/PL;	
ATI+Bus+Acron					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Aviation% Traders+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Avondale% Industries+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Bachem+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Basha+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Bennington+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Beverly% Enterprises+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Black^ANDDecker+Bus				PROP/SG;	
Boehringer-Ingelheim% Pharmaceuticals+Bus	PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Bradesco-Brazilian+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
British% Home% Stores+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Buick+Prod					PROP;
Burlington% Resources+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Byerly's+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Caraceni+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
CBl% Industries+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Century% Fox+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Chips^ANDTechnologies+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Chrysler+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Coates+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Coles% Supermarkets+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Coltec+Bus					PROP/PL;	
Columbia% Records+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Conad+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Conner% Peripherals+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Consumer% Reports+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Continental% Airlines+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Cooper% Industries+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Danish% Crown+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Delta% Air% Lines+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Destination% Films+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Dillard% Department% Stores+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Dime% Savings% Bank% of% New% York+Bus		PROP/SG;	
Donnelley^ANDSons+Bus				PROP/PL;	
EDP+Bus+Acron					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Eurocopter+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Federated% Department% Stores+Bus		PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Flugzeugbau+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Fox% Searchlight% Pictures+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Frito+Prod					PROP;
Gabro+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Grand% Union+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Gulf% Canada% Resources+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
HBO% Films+Bus					PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Het% Nieuwsblad+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
IG% Farben+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Information% Dimensions+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Island% Finance+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Johnson% Controls+Bus				PROP/PL;	
kermit+Bus					PROP/SG;	!# ?
Krka% Pharmaceuticals+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Lada% aka% VAZ+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Lisa+Bus					PROP/SG;	
MacX+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Masco% Industries+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Medco% Containment+Bus				PROP/SG;	
Miramax% Films+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Mondragón% Corporación% Coooperativa+Bus	PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Navistar% International+Bus			PROP/SG;	
New% York% Department% Stores+Bus		PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
NRK+Bus+Acron					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Parafernalia+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Paramount% Classics+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Personal% Library% Services+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Place% Beauvau+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Promotores% Latinos+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Ralph% Lauren% Polo+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Republic% Pictures+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Russell-Knight+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Safeway% Stores+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Scribners+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Silicon% Graphics+Bus				PROP/PL;	
Sing% Tao% Daily+Bus				PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Spartan% Stores+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Stanhome+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Sweet% Tomatoes+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Synaspismos+Org				PROP/SG;	!	[3]
Texas% Instruments+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
The% American% Prospect+Bus			PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Tjorven+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Trans% World% Airlines+Bus			PROP/PL;	
UAZ+Bus+Acron					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Union% Planters+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Universal% Studios+Bus				PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Varian+Bus					PROP/SG;	
Wal-mart+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Walt% Disney% Pictures+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Washington% Mutual% Savings+Bus			PROP/PL;	
Wm% Morrison% Supermarkets+Bus			PROP/PL;	!#	[2]
Woolworths+Bus					PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
